Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1022.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 39, chapter 1, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 39-130, to read: START_STATUTE39-130. Booking photographs; photo enforcement system recordings; nondisclosure; definitions A. This chapter does not require the disclosure of a booking photograph or a photograph, video or other digital recording of a person that is used as part of a photo enforcement system. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Booking photograph" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-7901. 2. "Photo enforcement system" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-601. END_STATUTE